Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 17-23-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Wyoming Statutory Trust Act.”

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Beneficial owner” means any owner of a beneficial interest in a statutory trust. The fact of ownership shall be determined and evidenced, whether by means of registration, the issuance of certificates or otherwise, in conformity to the applicable provisions of the governing instrument of the statutory trust;

“Governing instrument” means a trust instrument which creates a statutory trust and provides for the governance of the affairs of the statutory trust and the conduct of its business. A governing instrument may:

Provide that a person shall become a beneficial owner and shall become bound by the governing instrument if the person, or a representative authorized by the person orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a beneficial interest, complies with the conditions for becoming a beneficial owner set forth in the governing instrument or any other writing and acquires a beneficial interest; and

Consist of one (1) or more agreements, instruments or other writings and may include or incorporate bylaws containing provisions relating to the business of the statutory trust, the conduct of its affairs and its rights or powers or the rights or powers of its trustees, beneficial owners, agents or employees.

“Other business entity” means a corporation, a partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability company, a common-law trust or any other unincorporated business, excluding a statutory trust;

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, trust, estate, association, corporation, custodian, nominee or any other individual or entity in its own or any representative capacity;

“Statutory trust” means an unincorporated association which:

Is created by a trust instrument under which property is or will be held, managed, administered, controlled, invested, reinvested or operated, or business or professional activities for profit are carried on or will be carried on, by a trustee or trustees for the benefit of a person who is or may become entitled to a beneficial interest in the trust property, including but not limited to a trust of the type known at common law as a “business trust,” “Massachusetts trust,” a trust qualifying as a real estate investment trust under sections 856 through 859 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or under any successor provision, or a trust qualifying as a real estate mortgage investment conduit under section 860D of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or under any successor provision; and

Files a certificate of trust pursuant to W.S.

17-23-114

. Any association meeting the definition of this paragraph whether organized before or after the effective date of this chapter shall be a statutory trust and a separate legal entity.

“Trustee” means the person or persons appointed as a trustee in accordance with the governing instrument of a statutory trust, and may include the beneficial owners or any of them.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Beneficial owner not shown. —

Reviewing court overruled the claim that the son became a certificate holder of the trust upon the testator's execution of the transfer document, because pursuant to the trust provisions, a transfer was effective only when a new certificate was issued and recorded, and it was undisputed that this procedure was not followed.
Sherard v. Sherard, 2006 WY 105, 142 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 17-23-103.
Purpose.

Statutory trusts may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose, except acting as an insurer as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xvi), or acting as a financial institution as defined by W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix) or its successor statute, whether or not conducted for profit, or for any of the purposes referred to in W.S. 17-23-102(a)(v)(A) including, without limitation, for the purpose of holding or otherwise taking title to property, whether in an active or custodial capacity.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 1997, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 17-23-104.
Contributions by beneficial owners.

A contribution of a beneficial owner to the statutory trust may be in cash, property or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services. A person may become a beneficial owner of a statutory trust and may receive a beneficial interest in a statutory trust without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the statutory trust.

Except as provided in the governing instrument, a beneficial owner is obligated to the statutory trust to perform any promise to contribute cash, property or to perform services, even if the beneficial owner is unable to perform because of death, disability or any other reason. If a beneficial owner does not make the required contribution of property or services, the beneficial owner is obligated at the option of the statutory trust to contribute cash equal to that portion of the agreed value, as stated in the records of the statutory trust, of the contribution that has not been made. The cash contribution shall be in addition to any other rights, including the right to specific performance, that the statutory trust may have against the beneficial owner under the governing instrument or applicable law.

A governing instrument may provide that the interest of any beneficial owner who fails to make any contribution that he is obligated to make shall be subject to specific penalties or consequences for the failure. The penalty or consequence may take the form of:

Reducing or eliminating the defaulting beneficial owner’s proportionate interest in the statutory trust;

Subordinating his beneficial interest to that of nondefaulting beneficial owners;

A forced sale of his beneficial interest;

Forfeiture of his beneficial interest;

The lending by other beneficial owners of the amount necessary to meet his commitment;

Fixing of the value of his beneficial interest by appraisal or by formula and redemption or sale of his beneficial interest at that value; or

Any other penalty or consequence.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-105.
Liability of beneficial owners and trustees.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the beneficial owner shall be entitled to any limitations of personal liability extended to shareholders of private corporations for profit organized under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act or extended to members of limited liability companies organized under the Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a trustee, when acting in that capacity, shall not be personally liable to any persons other than the statutory trust or a beneficial owner for any act, omission or obligation of the statutory trust or any trustee. Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S.

17-23-113

, trustees of a statutory trust shall not be held to a more rigorous standard of care than that imposed upon directors of a business corporation under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act. —

See §§

17-15-101

and 17-15-102(a)(vi).

Wyoming Business Corporation Act. —

See chapter 16 of title 17.

§ 17-23-106.
Legal proceedings.

A statutory trust may sue and be sued in its own name, and service of process upon any one (1) of the trustees or upon the registered agent shall be sufficient. A statutory trust may be sued for debts and other obligations or liabilities contracted or incurred by the trustees, or by the duly authorized agents of the trustees, in the performance of their respective duties under the governing instrument of the statutory trust, and for any damages to persons or property resulting from the negligence of the trustees or agents acting in the performance of their respective duties. The property of a statutory trust shall be subject to attachment and execution pursuant to the Wyoming Code of Civil Procedure, as if it were a corporation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, in the event that the governing instrument of a statutory trust which is a registered investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, creates one (1) or more series as provided in W.S. 17-23-108(b)(ii), the debts, liabilities, obligations and expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing with respect to a particular series shall be enforceable against the assets of that series only, and not against the assets of the statutory trust generally if:

Separate and distinct records are maintained for the series;

The assets associated with the series are held and accounted for separately from the other assets of the statutory trust, or any other series of that trust; and

The governing instrument so provides, and notice of the limitation on liabilities of a series as referenced in this subsection is set forth in the certificate of trust of the statutory trust.

A trustee of a statutory trust may be served with process in the manner prescribed in subsection (d) of this section in all civil actions or proceedings brought in this state involving or relating to the activities of the statutory trust or a violation by a trustee of a duty to the statutory trust, or any beneficial owner, whether or not the trustee is a trustee at the time suit is commenced. Every resident or nonresident of the state who accepts election or appointment or serves as a trustee of a statutory trust shall, by the acceptance or service, have consented to the appointment of the registered agent of the statutory trust required by W.S.

17-23-109

as that person’s agent upon whom service of process may be made as provided in this section. Any process served in accordance with this section shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the trustee within the state and the appointment of the registered agent shall be irrevocable.

Service of process shall be effected by serving a Wyoming trustee or registered agent of the statutory trust required by W.S.

17-23-109

, with one (1) copy of the process in the manner provided by law for service of process.

In the governing instrument or other writing, a trustee may consent to be subject to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the courts of, or arbitration in, a specified jurisdiction, or the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of, or the exclusivity of arbitration in, this state, and to be served with legal process in the manner prescribed in the governing instrument or other writing.

Nothing in this section limits or affects the right to serve process in any other manner provided by law. This section is an extension of and not a limitation upon the right otherwise existing of service of legal process upon nonresidents.

A partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other nonnatural person formed or organized under the laws of any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction or the laws of any state other than the state of Wyoming shall not be deemed to be doing business in the state solely by reason of its being a trustee of a statutory trust.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-107.
Rights of beneficial owners in trust property.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a beneficial owner shall have an undivided beneficial interest in the property of the statutory trust and shall share in the profits or losses of the statutory trust in the proportion of the entire undivided beneficial interest in the statutory trust he owns. The governing instrument of a statutory trust may provide that the statutory trust or the trustees, acting for and on behalf of the statutory trust, shall be deemed to hold beneficial ownership of any income earned on securities of the statutory trust issued by any business entities formed, organized or existing under the laws of any jurisdiction, including the laws of any foreign country.

No creditor of the beneficial owner shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the statutory trust.

A beneficial owner’s beneficial interest in the statutory trust is personal property notwithstanding the nature of the property of the trust. Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a beneficial owner has no interest in specific statutory trust property.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the transferee of a beneficial owner’s beneficial interest in the statutory trust shall only be entitled to receive the share of profits and the return of contributions to which the beneficial owner otherwise would be entitled. In the absence of the unanimous written consent of the owners of all other beneficial interests and of all trustees of the statutory trust, and except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a transferee of a beneficial owner’s beneficial interest shall have no right to participate in, be kept apprised of the affairs of the statutory trust or to become a beneficial owner of a beneficial interest in the statutory trust.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, at the time a beneficial owner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the statutory trust with respect to the distribution. A governing instrument may provide for the establishment of record dates with respect to allocations and distributions by a statutory trust.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-108.
Management of statutory trust.

The business and affairs of a statutory trust shall be managed by or under the direction of its trustees. To the extent provided in the governing instrument, any person, including a beneficial owner, shall be entitled to direct the trustees in the management of a statutory trust. Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, neither the power to give direction to a trustee nor the exercise thereof by any person, including a beneficial owner, shall cause the person to be a trustee.

A governing instrument may contain any provision relating to the management of the business and affairs of the statutory trust, and the rights, duties and obligations of the trustees, beneficial owners and other persons, which is not contrary to any provision or requirement of this chapter and, without limitation may:

Provide for classes, groups or series of trustees or beneficial owners, or classes, groups or series of beneficial interests, having the relative rights, powers and duties as the governing instrument may provide, and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided in the governing instrument of additional classes, groups or series of trustees, beneficial owners or beneficial interests, having such relative rights, powers and duties as may be established, including rights, powers and duties senior or subordinate to existing classes, groups or series of trustees, beneficial owners or beneficial interests;

Establish or provide for the establishment of designated series of trustees, beneficial owners or beneficial interests having separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property or obligations of the statutory trust or profits and losses associated with specified property or obligations, and, to the extent provided in the governing instrument, any designated series may have a separate business purpose or investment objective;

Provide for the taking of any action, including the amendment of the governing instrument, the accomplishment of a merger or consolidation, the appointment of one (1) or more trustees, the sale, lease, exchange, transfer, pledge or other disposition of all or any part of the assets of the statutory trust or the assets of any series, or the dissolution of the statutory trust, or may provide for the taking of any action to create under the provisions of the governing instrument a class, group or series of beneficial interests that was not previously outstanding, in any such case without the vote of or approval of any particular trustee or beneficial owner, or class, group or series of trustees or beneficial owners;

Grant to, or withhold from, all or certain trustees or beneficial owners, or a specified class, group or series of trustees or beneficial owners, the right to vote, separately or with any other classes, groups or series of the trustees or beneficial owners, on any matter, with voting being on a per capita, number, financial interest, class, group series or any other basis;

To the extent that voting rights are granted under the governing instrument, set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on, waiver of any notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of record dates, quorum requirements, voting in person, by proxy or in any other manner, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any right to vote;

Provide for the present or future creation of more than one (1) statutory trust, including the creation of a future statutory trust to which all or any part of the assets, liabilities, profits or losses of any existing statutory trust will be transferred, and for the conversion of beneficial interests in an existing statutory trust, or series thereof, into beneficial interests in the separate statutory trust, or series thereof.

To the extent that, at law or in equity, a trustee has duties, including fiduciary duties, and liabilities relating to a statutory trust or to a beneficial owner:

Any trustee acting under a governing instrument shall not be liable to the statutory trust or to any beneficial owner for the trustee’s good faith reliance on the provisions of the governing instrument; and

The trustee’s duties and liabilities may be expanded or restricted by provisions in a governing instrument.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-109.
Registered office and registered agent to be maintained.

Each statutory trust shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

; and

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all statutory trusts.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by rewriting (a)(i) and (a)(ii) and inserted (b).

§ 17-23-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1, related to changes of registered office or registered agent.

§ 17-23-111.
Failure to maintain registered agent or registered office or pay annual fee.

If any statutory trust has failed to comply with the provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

or has failed to pay the fee required by W.S.

17-23-117

, it is transacting business within this state without authority and shall forfeit any franchises, rights or privileges acquired under the laws of this state. The forfeiture shall be made effective in the following manner. The secretary of state shall provide by first class mail or by electronic means a notice of its failure to comply. Unless compliance is made within sixty (60) days of mailing or electronic submission of the notice, the statutory trust shall be deemed defunct and to have forfeited its certificate of organization acquired under the laws of this state. Any defunct statutory trust may at any time within two (2) years after the forfeiture of its certificate, be revived and reinstated, by filing the necessary statement under this chapter and paying the prescribed fee, together with a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00). The statutory trust shall retain its registered name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 1999, ch. 196, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2017 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by rewriting the first half of the first sentence and in the second sentence substituted “sixty (60) days” for “thirty (30) days.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “first class mail, or by electronic means if the statutory trust has consented to receive notices electronically” for “certified mail” in the second sentence, and substituted “mailing or electronic submission of the notice” for “the delivery of notice” in the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence, substituted "provide" for "mail," deleted "if the statutory trust has consented to receive notices electronically" following "electronic means" and made a related change.

§ 17-23-112.
Existence of statutory trust.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the statutory trust shall have perpetual existence.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the death, incapacity, dissolution, termination or bankruptcy of a beneficial owner shall not result in the termination or dissolution of a statutory trust.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-113.
Applicability of trust law.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument or in this chapter, the laws of this state pertaining to trusts are hereby made applicable to statutory trusts. A statutory trust complying with the provisions of this chapter shall not be considered a financial institution as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-114.
Certificate of trust; amendment; cancellation.

Every statutory trust shall file a certificate of trust in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of trust shall set forth:

The name of the statutory trust, which shall not be the same as, or deceptively similar to any trademark or service mark registered in this state and shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from other business names as required by W.S.

17-16-401

;

The name and the business address of at least one (1) of the trustees authorized to manage the statutory trust;

The future effective date or time of the certificate if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information the trustee determines to include.

A certificate of trust may be amended by filing a certificate of amendment in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of amendment shall set forth:

The name of the statutory trust;

The amendment to the certificate; and

The future effective date or time of the certificate if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate.

A certificate of trust may be amended at any time for any purpose as the trustees may determine. A trustee who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of trust was false when made or that any matter described has changed making the certificate false in any material respect, shall promptly file a certificate of amendment.

A certificate of trust shall be canceled upon the completion of winding up of the statutory trust and its termination. A certificate of cancellation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and set forth:

The name of the statutory trust;

The date of filing of its certificate of trust;

The future effective date or time of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information the trustee determines to include.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, § 2.

§ 17-23-115.
Execution of certificate.

Each certificate required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner:

A certificate of trust shall be signed by at least one (1) of the trustees;

A certificate of amendment shall be signed by at least one (1) of the trustees;

A certificate of cancellation shall be signed by all of the trustees or as otherwise provided in the governing instrument;

If a statutory trust is filing a certificate of merger or consolidation, the certificate of merger or consolidation shall be signed by all of the trustees or as otherwise provided in the governing instrument. If the certificate of merger or consolidation is being filed by another business entity, the certificate of merger or consolidation shall be signed by a person authorized to execute the instrument on behalf of the other business entity; and

The certificate of trust shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment manually signed by the registered agent.

The execution of a certificate by a trustee constitutes an oath or affirmation, under the penalties of false swearing of W.S.

6-5-303

, that, to the best of the trustee’s knowledge and belief, the facts stated are true.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-116.
Filing of certificate; effective date; fee; organization.

The original signed copy together with a duplicate copy, which may be either a signed or conformed copy, of the certificate of trust and any certificates of amendment or cancellation or any certificate of merger or consolidation shall be delivered to the secretary of state. Unless the secretary of state finds that any certificate does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required he shall:

Certify that the certificate of trust, the certificate of amendment, the certificate of cancellation or the certificate of merger or consolidation has been filed in his office by endorsing upon the original and duplicate copy of the certificate the word “Filed,” and the date and hour of the filing. This endorsement is conclusive of the date and time of its filing in the absence of actual fraud;

File and index the original endorsed certificate; and

Issue a certificate of organization to which he shall affix the duplicate copy of the certificate of trust. In the case of the filing of any certificate other than a certificate of trust, the secretary of state shall return the duplicate copy, similarly endorsed, to the person who filed it or his representative.

A certificate of trust, certificate of amendment, certificate of cancellation or certificate of merger or consolidation which acts as a certificate of cancellation shall be effective as provided in W.S.

17-23-118

.

A fee as set forth in W.S.

17-23-117

shall be paid at the time of the filing of a certificate of trust, a certificate of amendment, a certificate of cancellation or a certificate of merger or consolidation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of organization, the statutory trust shall be considered organized. The certificate of organization shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the trustee and beneficial owners have been complied with and that the statutory trust has been legally organized under this chapter, except as against this state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of organization or for involuntary dissolution of the statutory trust.

A statutory trust shall not transact business or incur indebtedness, except that which is incidental to its organization or until the secretary of state has issued a certificate of organization.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a certificate of trust, certificate of amendment, certificate of cancellation or certificate of merger or consolidation under subsection (a) of this section, the secretary of state shall return it to the filing party or its representative within fifteen (15) days after the certificate was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (f).

§ 17-23-117.
Administration; filing, service and copying fees; annual fee.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required by this chapter. The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The secretary of state shall set and collect filing, service and copying fees to recover costs to administer this chapter. Fees shall not exceed the costs of providing these services.

The secretary of state shall collect an annual tax of one hundred dollars ($100.00), due and payable January 2 of each year. This tax is delinquent if not paid by February 1 and an addition to the tax shall then be due of one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-118.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced by the secretary of state’s date and time endorsement on the original document; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, which shall be a date and time certain, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than ninety (90) days after the date it is filed.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-119.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to reserve the exclusive use of a statutory trust name by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the statutory trust name applied for is available, the secretary shall file the application and reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a nonrenewable one hundred twenty (120) day period.

The owner of a reserved statutory trust name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a manually signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-120.
Derivative actions.

A beneficial owner may bring an action in the district court in the right of a statutory trust to recover a judgment in its favor if trustees with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those trustees to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a beneficial owner at the time of bringing the action and:

At the time of the transaction of which he complains; or

His status as a beneficial owner had devolved upon him by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the governing instrument of the statutory trust from a person who was a beneficial owner at the time of the transaction.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort, if any, of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by the trustees, or the reasons for not making the effort.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by a statutory trust as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any derivative action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees. If anything is so received by the plaintiff, the court shall make the award of the plaintiff’s expenses payable out of those proceeds and direct the plaintiff to remit to the statutory trust the remainder of the proceeds. If those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse the plaintiff’s reasonable expenses, the court may direct that any award of plaintiff’s expenses or portion thereof be paid by the statutory trust.

A beneficial owner’s right to bring a derivative action may be subject to additional standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in the governing instrument, including, without limitation, the requirement that beneficial owners owning a specified beneficial interest in the statutory trust join in the bringing of the derivative action.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-121.
Indemnification.

Subject to standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in the governing instrument, a statutory trust shall have the power to indemnify and hold harmless any trustee or beneficial owner or other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever.

The absence of a provision for indemnity in the governing instrument shall not be construed to deprive any trustee or beneficial owner or other person of any right to indemnity which is otherwise available to the person under the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.